Hawaii statutes.
§386-42 Dependents. (a) The following
persons, and no others, shall be deemed dependents and entitled to income, and
indemnity benefits under this chapter:

(1) A child who is:

(A) Unmarried and under eighteen years;

(B) Unmarried and under twenty years if the
child is a full-time student at a high school, business school, or technical
school, or unmarried and under twenty-two years if the child is a full-time
undergraduate student at a college;

(C) Unmarried and incapable of self-support;
or

(D) Married and under eighteen years, if
actually dependent upon the deceased;

(2) The surviving spouse or reciprocal beneficiary,
if either living with the deceased at the time of the injury or actually
dependent upon the deceased;

(3) A parent or grandparent, if actually dependent
upon the deceased; and

(4) A grandchild, brother, or sister, if under
eighteen years or incapable of self-support, and actually and wholly dependent
upon the deceased.

(b) A person shall be deemed to be actually
dependent upon the deceased, if the deceased contributed all or a substantial
portion of the living expenses of that person at the time of the injury.

(c) Alien dependents not residing in the
United States at the time of the injury or leaving the United States subsequently
shall maintain annual proof of such dependency as required by the director of
labor and industrial relations. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-41; am L
1967, c 213, §1 and c 257, §1; HRS §386-42; am L 1971, c 87, §1; am L 1974, c
151, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1997, c 383, §54; am L 2016, c 55, §13]

Case Notes

Alien Japanese dependent upon leaving the United States loses
all rights to benefits; "leaving the U. S." construed; an alien widow
leaving the U.S. ceases to be a "dependent". 27 H. 431 (1923).

Illegitimate children. 31 H. 814 (1931).

Nonresident alien. 32 H. 118 (1931).

Alien "actually residing". 32 H. 699 (1933).

Citizen of Philippine Republic. 39 H. 258 (1952).

Actual dependency of parents on child. 43 H. 173 (1959).

Part-time students, as defined by each individual educational
institution, are not entitled to compensation under subsection (a) and
§386-43(a). 84 H. 390 (App.), 935 P.2d 105 (1997).

Cited: 41 H. 442, 447 (1956).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next